apertium-ur-hi.hi.dix
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>ंँंःऄअआइईउऊऋऌऍऎएऐऑऒओऔकखगघङचछझजञटठडढणतथदधनऩपफबभमयरऱलळऴवशषसह़ऽािीुूृॄॅॆेैॉॊोौ्ॐ॓॔क़ख़ग़ज़ड़ढ़फ़य़ॠॡॢॣ०१२३४५६७८९ॱॲॻॼॽॾॿ</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="ant"     c="Anthroponym"/>
    <sdef n="n"       c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="np"      c="Proper noun"/>
    <sdef n="num"     c="Numeral"/>
    <sdef n="adj"     c="Adjective"/>
    <sdef n="adv"     c="Adverb"/>
    <sdef n="prn"     c="Pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="det"     c="Determiner"/>
    <sdef n="post"    c="Postposition"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"   c="Verb"/>
    <sdef n="vbser"   c="Verb (to be)"/>
    <sdef n="vbmod"   c="Modal verb"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"  c="Co-ordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"  c="Sub-ordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="pp"      c="Past participle"/> 
    <sdef n="pri"     c="Present indicative"/> 
    <sdef n="pr"      c="Preposition"/>

    <sdef n="nom"     c="Nominative"/>

    <sdef n="f"       c="Feminine"/>
    <sdef n="m"       c="Masculine"/>
    <sdef n="GD"      c="Gender dependent"/>

    <sdef n="sg"      c="Singular"/>
    <sdef n="pl"      c="Plural"/>
    <sdef n="ND"      c="Nature dependent"/>

    <sdef n="obl"     c="Oblique"/>
    <sdef n="voc"     c="Vocative"/>
    <sdef n="ind"     c="Indefinite"/>

   <sdef n="dem"      c="Demonstrative"/>


    <sdef n="p1"      c="First person"/>
    <sdef n="p2"      c="Second person"/>
    <sdef n="p3"      c="Third person"/>

    <sdef n="inf"     c="Infinitive"/>
    <sdef n="pres"    c="Present tense"/>
    <sdef n="past"    c="Past"/> 


    <sdef n="sent"    c="Sentence marker"/>
  </sdefs>

  <pardefs>

    <!-- Prepositions -->
    <pardef n="ओर__pr">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
       </pardef>


    <!-- Punctuation -->

    <pardef n="numeros">
      <e>
        <re>[०१२३४५६७८९]+([.,][०१२३४५६७८९]+)?</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>    

    <pardef n="sent">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Pronoun -->
    <pardef n="यह__prn">
            <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="वह__prn">
            <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <!-- Proper nouns -->
    <pardef n="मरियम__np">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="आमिल__np">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Nouns -->

    <pardef n="लोगों__n_m">
            <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>    

    <pardef n="आँखों__n_f">
            <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>  	


    
    <pardef n="ऊब__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="सद/्__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्</l>
          <r>्<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्</l>
          <r>्<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्</l>
          <r>्<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ों</l>
          <r>्<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="जड__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ें</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>और</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ों</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="बला__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>यें</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>एँ</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओं</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="थ__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>      
       <e>
        <p>
          <l>े</l>
          <r>े<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
       <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>      
       <e>
        <p>
          <l>ों</l>
          <r>ों<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/अ__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>अ</l>
          <r>अ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>अ</l>
          <r>अ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>अ</l>
          <r>अ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओं</l>
          <r>अ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="दग/ा__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>े</l>
          <r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>े</l>
          <r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>े</l>
          <r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="खडा/ऊँ__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ऊँ</l>
          <r>ऊँ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ऊँ</l>
          <r>ऊँ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ऊँ</l>
          <r>ऊँ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उँओं</l>
          <r>ऊँ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

     <e lm="?"><i>?</i><par n="sent"/></e>
     <e lm="."><i>.</i><par n="sent"/></e>
     <e lm="!"><i>!</i><par n="sent"/></e>
     <e lm=","><i>,</i><par n="sent"/></e>
    <e lm="आमिल"><i>आमिल</i><par n="आमिल__np"/></e>
    <e lm="लोगों"><i>लोगों</i><par n="लोगों__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="बच्चों"><i>बच्चों</i><par n="लोगों__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="अट्ठानवेअ"><i>अट्ठानवे</i><par n="/अ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="चर्चा"><i>चर्चा</i><par n="बला__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="चहक"><i>चहक</i><par n="ऊब__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="अकलदाढ"><i>अकलदाढ</i><par n="जड__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="अठासीअ"><i>अठासी</i><par n="/अ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रतिबंधवान्"><i>प्रतिबंधवान</i><par n="सद/्__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रकाशनाधिकार"><i>प्रकाशनाधिकार</i><par n="थ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="काँसा"><i>काँस</i><par n="दग/ा__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="परिभावना"><i>परिभावना</i><par n="बला__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="मुनिअ"><i>मुनि</i><par n="/अ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="बमबारी"><i>बमबारी</i><par n="ऊब__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="नागबेल"><i>नागबेल</i><par n="जड__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="छियासीअ"><i>छियासी</i><par n="/अ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="रेफ्रिजरेटरअ"><i>रेफ्रिजरेटर</i><par n="/अ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="हलका"><i>हलक</i><par n="दग/ा__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="पणव"><i>पणव</i><par n="थ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="विद्"><i>विद</i><par n="सद/्__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="पाणिग्रहीता"><i>पाणिग्रहीता</i><par n="बला__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="चालाकी"><i>चालाकी</i><par n="ऊब__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ताक"><i>ताक</i><par n="जड__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="गणेशचतुर्थी"><i>गणेशचतुर्थी</i><par n="ऊब__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="लोथ"><i>लोथ</i><par n="जड__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="चारा"><i>चार</i><par n="दग/ा__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="आँखों"><i>आँखों</i><par n="आँखों__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="अधिपत्र"><i>अधिपत्र</i><par n="थ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="अधिनायकवादिता"><i>अधिनायकवादिता</i><par n="बला__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ज्यामिति"><i>ज्यामिति</i><par n="ऊब__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="कोपल"><i>कोपल</i><par n="जड__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="अट्ठासीअ"><i>अट्ठासी</i><par n="/अ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="मंत्रविद्"><i>मंत्रविद</i><par n="सद/्__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="उँजेरा"><i>उँजेर</i><par n="दग/ा__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रक्रम"><i>प्रक्रम</i><par n="थ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रेक्षावान्"><i>प्रेक्षावान</i><par n="सद/्__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="निश्चिंतता"><i>निश्चिंतता</i><par n="ऊब__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="किलकार"><i>किलकार</i><par n="जड__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="अ"><i></i><par n="/अ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रशाखा"><i>प्रशाखा</i><par n="बला__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="पक्का"><i>पक्क</i><par n="दग/ा__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="सद्"><i>सद</i><par n="सद/्__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="जायफल"><i>जायफल</i><par n="थ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="गौना"><i>गौन</i><par n="दग/ा__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="गुंबद"><i>गुंबद</i><par n="जड__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="साक्षिता"><i>साक्षिता</i><par n="ऊब__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="शकुनिका"><i>शकुनिका</i><par n="बला__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="बलवान्"><i>बलवान</i><par n="सद/्__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="अक्षवृत्त"><i>अक्षवृत्त</i><par n="थ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="खडाऊँ"><i>खडा</i><par n="खडा/ऊँ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रज्ञावान्"><i>प्रज्ञावान</i><par n="सद/्__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="लौँग"><i>लौँग</i><par n="जड__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="पिपीलिका"><i>पिपीलिका</i><par n="बला__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="टकटकी"><i>टकटकी</i><par n="ऊब__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="पृथक्"><i>पृथक</i><par n="सद/्__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="गतिरोद"><i>गतिरोद</i><par n="थ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="चूरा"><i>चूर</i><par n="दग/ा__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="उदकक्रिया"><i>उदकक्रिया</i><par n="बला__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="यह"><i>यह</i><par n="यह__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="वह"><i>वह</i><par n="वह__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="उसके"><i>उसके</i><par n="यह__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="इन"><i>इन</i><par n="वह__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="आप"><i>आप</i><par n="यह__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="उसकी"><i>उसकी</i><par n="यह__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="तुम"><i>तुम</i><par n="यह__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="उन्होंने"><i>उन्होंने</i><par n="यह__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="उसका"><i>उसका</i><par n="यह__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="दूसरे"><i>दूसरे</i><par n="यह__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ओर"><i>ओर</i><par n="ओर__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="नीचे"><i>नीचे</i><par n="ओर__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="साथ"><i>साथ</i><par n="ओर__pr"/></e>
    <e><par n="numeros"/></e>
